Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2816
Dialysis drug or device distributor worker, defined.

Dialysis drug or device distributor worker means a person working for a dialysis drug or device distributor with a delegated dispensing permit who has completed the approved training and has demonstrated proficiency to perform the task or tasks of assembling, labeling, or delivering drugs or devices pursuant to a prescription.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 912.